Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 723.036 is repealed.
SECTION 2.  ORS 723.276 is amended to read:
723.276. (1) [At the organizational meeting of the board of directors  and within 60 days after each
annual meeting of the members, ] The board of directors shall elect an executive officer, whom the
directors may designate as chairperson of the board or president, a vice  chairperson of the board
or one or more vice presidents, a treasurer and a  secretary. The treasurer and the secretary may
be the same individual. The persons that the board of directors  elects are the executive officers of
the corporation.
(2) The terms of the officers are one  year, unless the bylaws prescribe a different term. Officers
may continue to serve until the successors of the officers are chosen and have duly qualified.
(3) The bylaws must prescribe the duties of the officers.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 723.266 is amended to read:
723.266. A credit union may pay to the  credit union’s directors , [ and] supervisory committee
members or members of other committees established by the board of  directors or pursuant
to bylaws reasonable compensation for service as  directors [ and supervisory ] or committee members
[and]. A  credit union  may reimburse directors[ , supervisory committee members and other ] or  com-
mittee members while the directors or committee  members are on official business for necessary
expenses incidental to performing the official business.
SECTION 4.  ORS 723.602 is amended to read:
723.602. A credit union may invest funds not used in loans to members in:
(1) Securities, obligations or other instruments of or issued by or fully guaranteed as to principal
and interest by the United States or an agency of  the United States or in a trust or trusts estab-
lished directly or collectively in  the securities, obligations or instruments described in this sub-
section.
(2) Obligations of a state of the United States, the agencies or  instrumentalities of the federal
government, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico  and the several territories
organized by Congress, or a political subdivision of  a state, district, commonwealth or territory
identified in this subsection.
(3) Certificates of deposit or passbook type accounts issued by a state or national  bank, mutual
savings bank or savings and loan association.
(4) Loans to or in shares or deposits of other credit unions.
Enrolled House Bill 3200 (HB 3200-A) Page 1
(5) Stocks, membership units or other ownership interests in, or loans to, a  corporation, limited
liability company or mutual association in an aggregate amount not to exceed five percent of
assets, if:
(a) The purposes for which the corporation,  limited liability company or mutual association is
organized are primarily to service or otherwise assist credit union operations[ .]; or
(b) The corporation,  limited liability company or mutual association provides goods or
services associated with the routine operations of the credit union, the  investment or loan
is reasonably related to the credit union’s use or potential use of the  goods or services pro-
vided, the investment or loan is made in accordance with any rules  governing such invest-
ments or loans as may be adopted by the Director of  the Department of Consumer and
Business Services  and the credit union receives prior approval for the investment or loan
from the director.
(6) Shares of a credit union cooperative society organized under the laws  of this state or of the
laws of the United States in a total amount not exceeding one percent of the  shares, deposits and
surplus of the credit union.
(7) Loans to a national or state credit union association or corporation of which the credit union
is a member, except that the loans must be limited to not more  than five percent of the assets of
the credit union.
(8) Other investments the Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services ap-
proves by rule or order.
Passed by House March 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 27, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3200 (HB 3200-A) Page 2